Washington statutes.
RCW 38.56.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Assistance" means emergency responders and resources provided by a responding member jurisdiction in response to a request from a requesting member jurisdiction.

(2) "Department" means the state military department.

(3) "Emergency" means an event or set of circumstances that: (a) Demand immediate action to preserve public health, protect life, protect public property, or to provide relief to any stricken community overtaken by such occurrence; or (b) reach such a dimension or degree of destructiveness as to warrant the governor declaring a state of emergency pursuant to RCW 43.06.010.

(4) "Emergency responder" means an employee of a responding member jurisdiction who is designated in writing by that responding member jurisdiction as possessing skills, qualifications, training, knowledge, or experience that may be needed, pursuant to a request for assistance under this chapter, for: (a) Response, mitigation, or recovery activities related to an emergency; or (b) participation in drills or exercises in preparation for an emergency.

(5) "Operational control" means the limited authority to direct tasks, assignments, and use of assistance provided pursuant to a request for assistance under this chapter to address: (a) Response, mitigation, or recovery activities related to an emergency; or (b) participation in drills or exercises in preparation for an emergency. "Operational control" does not include any right, privilege, or benefit of ownership or employment such as disposition, compensation, wages, salary, pensions, health benefits, leave, seniority, discipline, promotion, hiring, or firing.

(6) "Political subdivision" means any county, city, or town in the state of Washington.

(7) "Requesting member jurisdiction" means a member jurisdiction that requests assistance from another member jurisdiction under this chapter.

(8) "Resources" includes supplies, materials, equipment, facilities, energy, services, information, systems, and other assets except for emergency responders that may be needed, pursuant to a request for assistance under this chapter, for: (a) Response, mitigation, or recovery activities related to an emergency; or (b) participation in drills or exercises in preparation for an emergency.

(9) "Responding member jurisdiction" means a member jurisdiction providing or intending to provide assistance to a requesting member jurisdiction under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 79 s 1.]